Nevada, session 83, AB534.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 293 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2, 3 and 4 of this act.
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. Except as otherwise provided in this title, if the
Secretary of State requests any information or data relating to the
current election cycle from a county clerk or city clerk, the county
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 6 –
or city clerk shall, not later than the second working day after
receiving the request, respond to the Secretary of State with:
1. The information or data; or
2. A written explanation that indicates when the clerk will
reasonably be able to provide the information or data.
Sec. 4. If an active registered voter moves to another county
and registers to vote therein, which may include, without
limitation, an application to register to vote which is transmitted to
a county clerk from an automatic voter registration agency:
1. It shall be deemed that the voter is updating his or her
voter registration rather than registering to vote; and
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5832, the voter
must not be required to, on the basis of the update to his or her
address, cast a provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to
293.3086, inclusive, or a conditional ballot pursuant to NRS
293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
Sec. 5. NRS 293.093 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.093 “Regular votes” means the votes cast by registered
voters, except votes cast by:
1. A mail ballot;
2. A provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086,
inclusive; or
3. A [provisional] conditional ballot pursuant to NRS
293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
Sec. 6. NRS 293.1276 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.1276 1. [Within 4] Except as otherwise provided by
NRS 295.056, within 9 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and
holidays, after the submission of a petition containing signatures
which are required to be verified pursuant to NRS 293.128, 295.056,
298.109, 306.035 or 306.110, and within [2] 7 days, excluding
Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after the submission of a petition
containing signatures which are required to be verified pursuant to
NRS 293.172 or 293.200, the county clerk shall determine the total
number of signatures affixed to the documents and, in the case of a
petition for initiative or referendum proposing a constitutional
amendment or statewide measure, shall tally the number of
signatures for each petition district contained fully or partially
within the county and forward that information to the Secretary of
State.
2. If the Secretary of State finds that the total number of
signatures filed with all the county clerks is less than 100 percent of
the required number of registered voters, the Secretary of State shall
so notify the person who submitted the petition and the county
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 7 –
clerks and no further action may be taken in regard to the petition. If
the petition is a petition to recall a county, district or municipal
officer, the Secretary of State shall also notify the officer with
whom the petition is to be filed.
3. After the petition is submitted to the county clerk, it must
not be handled by any other person except by an employee of the
county clerk’s office until it is filed with the Secretary of State.
4. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations establishing
procedures to carry out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 7. NRS 293.1277 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.1277 1. If the Secretary of State finds that the total
number of signatures submitted to all the county clerks is 100
percent or more of the number of registered voters needed to declare
the petition sufficient, the Secretary of State shall immediately so
notify the county clerks. After the notification, each of the county
clerks shall determine the number of registered voters who have
signed the documents submitted in the county clerk’s county and, in
the case of a petition for initiative or referendum proposing a
constitutional amendment or statewide measure, shall tally the
number of signatures for each petition district contained or fully
contained within the county clerk’s county. This determination must
be completed within [9] 14 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and
holidays, after the notification pursuant to this subsection regarding
a petition containing signatures which are required to be verified
pursuant to NRS 293.128, 295.056, 298.109 or 306.110, within [20]
25 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays and holidays, after the
notification pursuant to this subsection regarding a petition
containing signatures which are required to be verified pursuant to
NRS 306.035, and within [3] 8 days, excluding Saturdays, Sundays
and holidays, after the notification pursuant to this subsection
regarding a petition containing signatures which are required to be
verified pursuant to NRS 293.172 or 293.200. For the purpose of
verification pursuant to this section, the county clerk shall not
include in his or her tally of total signatures any signature included
in the incorrect petition district.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, if more
than 500 names have been signed on the documents submitted to a
county clerk, the county clerk shall examine the signatures by
sampling them at random for verification. The random sample of
signatures to be verified must be drawn in such a manner that every
signature which has been submitted to the county clerk is given an
equal opportunity to be included in the sample. The sample must
include an examination of:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 8 –
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), at least 500
or 5 percent of the signatures, whichever is greater.
(b) If the petition is for the recall of a public officer who holds a
statewide office, at least 25 percent of the signatures.
 If documents were submitted to the county clerk for more than
one petition district wholly contained within that county, a separate
random sample must be performed for each petition district.
3. If a petition district comprises more than one county and the
petition is for an initiative or referendum proposing a constitutional
amendment or a statewide measure, and if more than 500 names
have been signed on the documents submitted for that petition
district, the appropriate county clerks shall examine the signatures
by sampling them at random for verification. The random sample of
signatures to be verified must be drawn in such a manner that every
signature which has been submitted to the county clerks within the
petition district is given an equal opportunity to be included in the
sample. The sample must include an examination of at least 500 or 5
percent of the signatures presented in the petition district, whichever
is greater. The Secretary of State shall determine the number of
signatures that must be verified by each county clerk within the
petition district.
4. If a petition is for the recall of a public officer who does not
hold a statewide office, each county clerk:
(a) Shall not examine the signatures by sampling them at
random for verification;
(b) Shall examine for verification every signature on the
documents submitted to the county clerk; and
(c) When determining the total number of valid signatures on
the documents, shall remove each name of a registered voter who
submitted a request to have his or her name removed from the
petition pursuant to NRS 306.015.
5. In determining from the records of registration the number
of registered voters who signed the documents, the county clerk may
use the signatures contained in the file of applications to register to
vote. If the county clerk uses that file, the county clerk shall ensure
that every application in the file is examined, including any
application in his or her possession which may not yet be entered
into the county clerk’s records. Except as otherwise provided in
subsection 6, the county clerk shall rely only on the appearance of
the signature and the address and date included with each signature
in making his or her determination.
6. If:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 9 –
(a) A person registers to vote using the system established by
the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671;
(b) A person registers to vote pursuant to NRS 293D.230 and
signs his or her application to register to vote using a digital
signature or an electronic signature; or
(c) A person is registered to vote by an automatic voter
registration agency,
 the county clerk may rely on such other indicia as prescribed by
the Secretary of State in making his or her determination.
7. In the case of a petition for initiative or referendum
proposing a constitutional amendment or statewide measure, when
the county clerk is determining the number of registered voters who
signed the documents from each petition district contained fully or
partially within the county clerk’s county, he or she must use the
statewide voter registration list available pursuant to NRS 293.675.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 10, upon
completing the examination, the county clerk shall immediately
attach to the documents a certificate properly dated, showing the
result of the examination, including the tally of signatures by
petition district, if required, and transmit the documents with the
certificate to the Secretary of State. In the case of a petition for
initiative or referendum proposing a constitutional amendment or
statewide measure, if a petition district comprises more than one
county, the appropriate county clerks shall comply with the
regulations adopted by the Secretary of State pursuant to this section
to complete the certificate. A copy of this certificate must be filed in
the clerk’s office. When the county clerk transmits the certificate to
the Secretary of State, the county clerk shall notify the Secretary of
State of the number of requests to remove a name received by the
county clerk pursuant to NRS 295.055 or pursuant to NRS 306.015
for a petition to recall a public officer who holds a statewide office,
if applicable.
9. A person who submits a petition to the county clerk which is
required to be verified pursuant to NRS 293.128, 293.172, 293.200,
295.056, 298.109, 306.035 or 306.110 must be allowed to witness
the verification of the signatures. A public officer who is the subject
of a recall petition must also be allowed to witness the verification
of the signatures on the petition.
10. For any petition containing signatures which are required to
be verified pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.200, 306.035 or
306.110 for any county, district or municipal office within one
county, the county clerk shall not transmit to the Secretary of State
the documents containing the signatures of the registered voters.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 10 –
11. The Secretary of State shall by regulation establish further
procedures for carrying out the provisions of this section.
Sec. 8. NRS 293.172 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.172 1. A petition filed pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
293.1715 may consist of more than one document. Each document
of the petition must:
(a) Bear the name of the minor political party and, if applicable,
the candidate and office to which the candidate is to be nominated.
(b) Include the affidavit of the person who circulated the
document verifying that the signers are registered voters in this State
according to his or her best information and belief and that the
signatures are genuine and were signed in his or her presence.
(c) Bear the name of a county and be submitted to the county
clerk of that county for verification in the manner prescribed in NRS
293.1276 to 293.1279, inclusive, not later than [10] 25 working days
before the last day to file the petition. A challenge to the form of a
document must be made in a district court in the county that is
named on the document.
(d) Be signed only by registered voters of the county that is
named on the document.
2. If the office to which the candidate is to be nominated is a
county office, only the registered voters of that county may sign the
petition. If the office to which the candidate is to be nominated is a
district office, only the registered voters of that district may sign the
petition.
3. Each person who signs a petition shall also provide the
address of the place where he or she resides, the date that he or she
signs and the name of the county in which he or she is registered to
vote.
4. The county clerk shall not disqualify the signature of a voter
who failed to provide all the information required by subsection 3 if
the voter is registered in the county named on the document.
Secs. 9 and 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. NRS 293.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.200 1. An independent candidate for partisan office must
file with the appropriate filing officer as set forth in NRS 293.185:
(a) A copy of the petition of candidacy that he or she intends to
subsequently circulate for signatures. The copy must be filed not
earlier than the January 2 preceding the date of the election and not
later than [10] 25 working days before the last day to file the
petition pursuant to subsection 4. The copy of the petition must be
filed with the appropriate filing officer before the petition may be
circulated for signatures.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 11 –
(b) Either of the following:
(1) A petition of candidacy signed by a number of registered
voters equal to at least 1 percent of the total number of ballots cast
in:
(I) This State for that office at the last preceding general
election in which a person was elected to that office, if the office is a
statewide office;
(II) The county for that office at the last preceding general
election in which a person was elected to that office, if the office is a
county office; or
(III) The district for that office at the last preceding
general election in which a person was elected to that office, if the
office is a district office.
(2) A petition of candidacy signed by 250 registered voters if
the candidate is a candidate for statewide office, or signed by 100
registered voters if the candidate is a candidate for any office other
than a statewide office.
2. The petition may consist of more than one document. Each
document must bear the name of the county in which it was
circulated, and only registered voters of that county may sign the
document. If the office is not a statewide office, only the registered
voters of the county, district or municipality in question may sign
the document. The documents that are circulated for signature in a
county must be submitted to that county clerk for verification in the
manner prescribed in NRS 293.1276 to 293.1279, inclusive, [not
later than 10 working days before] during the [last day to file the
petition pursuant to] period of time set forth in subsection 4. Each
person who signs the petition shall add to his or her signature the
address of the place at which the person actually resides, the date
that he or she signs the petition and the name of the county where he
or she is registered to vote. The person who circulates each
document of the petition shall sign an affidavit attesting that the
signatures on the document are genuine to the best of his or her
knowledge and belief and were signed in his or her presence by
persons registered to vote in that county.
3. The petition of candidacy may state the principle, if any,
which the person qualified represents.
4. Petitions of candidacy must be filed not earlier than the
[first] second Monday [in March preceding] following the [general]
primary election and not later than 5 p.m. on the third Friday
following the primary election. If a petition is submitted in [June.]
a timely manner pursuant to subsection 2 but the Secretary of
State receives certificates from the county clerks showing the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 12 –
petition to be signed by the requisite number of voters after 5 p.m.
on the third Friday following the primary election, the petition
shall be deemed to be timely filed with the Secretary of State.
5. No petition of candidacy may contain the name of more than
one candidate for each office to be filled.
6. A person may not file as an independent candidate if he or
she is proposing to run as the candidate of a political party.
7. The names of independent candidates must be placed on the
general election ballot and must not appear on the primary election
ballot.
8. If the sufficiency of the petition of the candidacy of any
person seeking to qualify pursuant to this section is challenged, all
affidavits and documents in support of the challenge must be filed
not later than 5 p.m. on the fourth Friday in June. Any judicial
proceeding resulting from the challenge must be set for hearing not
more than 5 days after the fourth Friday in June.
9. Any challenge pursuant to subsection 8 must be filed with:
(a) The First Judicial District Court if the petition of candidacy
was filed with the Secretary of State.
(b) The district court for the county where the petition of
candidacy was filed if the petition was filed with a county clerk.
10. The district court in which the challenge is filed shall give
priority to such proceedings over all other matters pending with the
court, except for criminal proceedings.
11. An independent candidate for partisan office must file a
declaration of candidacy with the appropriate filing officer and pay
the filing fee required by NRS 293.193 not earlier than the first
Monday in March of the year in which the election is held and not
later than 5 p.m. on the second Friday after the first Monday in
March.
Sec. 12. NRS 293.203 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.203 Immediately upon receipt by the county clerk of the
certified list of candidates for judicial and nonjudicial office from
the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.187, the county clerk
shall publish a notice of primary election or general election once a
week for 2 successive weeks in such a manner as the county clerk
deems proper which may include, without limitation, publication
in a newspaper of general circulation in the county [once a week for
2 successive weeks. If no such newspaper is published in the county,
the publication may be made in a newspaper of general circulation
published in] or the nearest Nevada county [.] , on the Internet
website of the county clerk or on the social media account of the
county clerk. The notice must contain:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 13 –
1. The date of the election.
2. The location of the polling places.
3. The hours during which the polling places will be open for
voting.
 The notice required for a general election pursuant to this section
may be published in conjunction with the notice required for a
proposed constitution or constitutional amendment pursuant to NRS
293.253. If the notices are combined in this manner, they must be
published three times in accordance with subsection 3 of
NRS 293.253.
Sec. 13. NRS 293.207 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.207 1. Election precincts must be established on the
basis of the number of registered voters therein, with a maximum of
5,000 registered voters who are not designated inactive pursuant to
NRS 293.530 per precinct in those precincts in which a mechanical
voting system is used [.] for casting ballots.
2. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 3 and 4, the
county clerk may consolidate two or more contiguous election
precincts into a single voting district to conduct a particular election
as public convenience, necessity and economy may require.
3. If a county clerk proposes to consolidate two or more
contiguous election precincts, in whole or in part, pursuant to
subsection 2, the county clerk shall, at least 14 days before
consolidating the precincts, cause notice of the proposed
consolidation to be:
(a) Posted in the manner prescribed for a regular meeting of the
board of county commissioners; and
(b) Mailed to each Assemblyman, Assemblywoman, State
Senator, county commissioner and, if applicable, member of the
governing body of a city who represents residents of a precinct
affected by the consolidation.
4. A person may file a written objection to the proposed
consolidation with the county clerk. The county clerk shall consider
each written objection filed pursuant to this subsection before
consolidating the precincts.
Sec. 14. NRS 293.247 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.247 1. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations, not
inconsistent with the election laws of this State, for the conduct of
primary, presidential preference primary, general, special and
district elections in all cities and counties. Permanent regulations of
the Secretary of State that regulate the conduct of a primary,
general, special or district election and are effective on or before the
last business day of February immediately preceding a primary,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 14 –
general, special or district election govern the conduct of that
election. Permanent regulations of the Secretary of State that
regulate the conduct of a presidential preference primary election
and are effective on or before the last business day of September
immediately preceding a presidential preference primary election
govern the conduct of that election.
2. The Secretary of State shall prescribe the forms for a
declaration of candidacy and any petition which is filed pursuant to
the election laws of this State.
3. The regulations must prescribe:
(a) The manner of printing ballots and the number of ballots to
be distributed to precincts and districts;
(b) The form and placement of instructions to voters;
(c) The disposition of election returns;
(d) The procedures to be used for canvasses, ties, recounts and
contests, including, without limitation, the appropriate use of a
paper record created when a voter casts a ballot on a mechanical
voting system that directly records the votes electronically;
(e) The procedures to be used to ensure the security of the
ballots from the time they are transferred from the polling place
until they are stored pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.391 or
293C.390;
(f) The procedures to be used to ensure the security and
accuracy of computer programs and tapes used for elections;
(g) The procedures to be used for the testing, use and auditing of
a mechanical voting system which directly records the votes
electronically and which creates a paper record when a voter casts a
ballot on the system;
(h) The acceptable standards for the sending and receiving of
applications, forms and ballots, by approved electronic transmission,
by the county clerks and the electors, registered voters or other
persons who are authorized to use approved electronic transmission
pursuant to the provisions of this title;
(i) The forms for applications to preregister and register to vote
and any other forms necessary for the administration of this title;
and
(j) Such other matters as determined necessary by the Secretary
of State.
4. The Secretary of State may adopt regulations which
provide standards for any reports required to be filed by a county
or city clerk pursuant to this title.
5. The Secretary of State may provide interpretations and take
other actions necessary for the effective administration of the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 15 –
statutes and regulations governing the conduct of primary,
presidential preference primary, general, special and district
elections in this State.
[5.] 6. The Secretary of State shall prepare and distribute to
each county and city clerk copies of:
(a) Laws and regulations concerning elections in this State;
(b) Interpretations issued by the Secretary of State’s Office; and
(c) Any Attorney General’s opinions or any state or federal
court decisions which affect state election laws or regulations
whenever any of those opinions or decisions become known to the
Secretary of State.
Secs. 15 and 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. NRS 293.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.253 1. The Secretary of State shall provide each county
clerk with copies of any proposed constitution or constitutional
amendment which will appear on the general election ballot,
together with the copies of the condensations, explanations,
arguments, rebuttals and fiscal notes prepared pursuant to NRS
218D.810, 293.250 and 293.252.
2. Whenever feasible, the Secretary of State shall provide those
copies on or before the first Monday in August of the year in which
the proposals will appear on the ballot. Copies of any additional
proposals must be provided as soon after their filing as feasible.
3. Each county clerk shall cause a copy of the full text of any
such constitution or amendment and its condensation, explanation,
arguments, rebuttals and fiscal note to be published, in conspicuous
display advertising format of not less than 10 column inches, in a
newspaper of general circulation in the county three times at
intervals of not less than 7 days, the first publication to be on or
before the first Monday in October. If no such newspaper is
published in the county, the publication may be made in a
newspaper of general circulation published in the nearest Nevada
county [.] and in addition to any publication made in a newspaper
pursuant to this subsection, a county clerk may publish a copy of
the full text of any such constitution or amendment and its
condensation, explanation, arguments, rebuttals and fiscal note in
such a manner as the county clerk deems proper which may
include, without limitation, publication on the Internet website of
the county clerk or on the social media account of the county
clerk.
4. If a copy of any such constitution or amendment is furnished
by the Secretary of State too late to be published at 7-day intervals,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 16 –
it must be published three times at the longest intervals feasible in
each county.
5. The portion of the cost of publication which is attributable to
publishing the questions, explanations, arguments, rebuttals and
fiscal notes of proposed constitutions or constitutional amendments
is a charge against the State and must be paid from the Reserve for
Statutory Contingency Account upon recommendation by the
Secretary of State and approval by the State Board of Examiners.
Sec. 18. NRS 293.269911 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269911 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section,
the county clerk shall prepare and distribute to each active registered
voter in the county and each person who registers to vote or updates
his or her voter registration information not later than the [14] 18
days before the election a mail ballot for every election. The county
clerk shall make reasonable accommodations for the use of the mail
ballot by a person who is elderly or disabled, including, without
limitation, by providing, upon request, the mail ballot in 12-point
type to a person who is elderly or disabled.
2. The county clerk shall allow a voter to elect not to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to this section by submitting to the county clerk
a written notice in the form prescribed by the county clerk which
must be received by the county clerk not later than 60 days before
the day of the election. If a voter elects not to receive a mail ballot
pursuant to this subsection, he or she may later elect to receive a
mail ballot for the election if he or she, not later than 14 days
before the election, submits to the county clerk a written notice in
the form prescribed by the county clerk.
3. The county clerk shall not distribute a mail ballot to any
person who:
(a) Registers to vote for the election pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; or
(b) Elects not to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The mail ballot must include all offices, candidates and
measures upon which the voter is entitled to vote at the election.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the
mail ballot must be distributed to:
(a) Each active registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, on or after the fifth Monday
before the election but not later than [20 days] the fourth Monday
before the election; and
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before the election.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 17 –
(b) Each active registered voter who registers to vote after the
dates set for distributing mail ballots pursuant to paragraph (a) but
who is eligible to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 1, not
later than 13 days before the election.
(c) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military-
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
6. In the case of a special election where no candidate for
federal office will appear on the ballot, the mail ballot must be
distributed to each active registered voter not later than 15 days
before the special election.
7. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the mail
ballot from being distributed to any voter pursuant to this section is
moot and of no effect.
Sec. 19. NRS 293.269925 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269925 1. The [county clerk] Secretary of State shall
establish procedures for minimum requirements for the processing
and counting of mail ballots.
2. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) May authorize mail ballots to be processed, verified and
counted by computer or other electronic means; and
(b) Must not conflict with the provisions of NRS 293.269911 to
293.269937, inclusive.
Sec. 20. NRS 293.269931 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293.269931 1. The mail ballot central counting board [may]
shall begin counting the received mail ballots 15 days before the
day of the election [.] and must process each mail ballot pursuant
to NRS 293.269933 within 24 hours after the receipt of the mail
ballot unless the Secretary of State grants a waiver requested
pursuant to subsection 2. The board must complete the count of all
mail ballots on or before the seventh day following the election. The
counting procedure must be public.
2. If a mail ballot central counting board is unable to process
a mail ballot within 24 hours after the receipt of the mail ballot,
the mail ballot central counting board may request a waiver from
the Secretary of State to extend the time that the mail ballot
central counting board has to process the mail ballot. A waiver
granted pursuant to this subsection must not authorize the mail
ballot central counting board to count the mail ballot after the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 18 –
deadline for the completion of the count of all mail ballots set
forth in subsection 1.
3. If two or more mail ballots are found folded together to
present the appearance of a single ballot, the mail ballots must be
rejected and placed in an envelope, upon which must be written the
reason for their rejection. The envelope must be signed by an
election board officer and placed in the container or ballot box after
the count is completed.
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 22. NRS 293.275 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.275 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, an
election board may not perform its duty in serving registered voters
at any polling place in any election provided for in this title, unless
it has before it:
(a) The roster designated for registered voters who apply to vote
at the polling place; and
(b) The roster designated for electors who apply to register to
vote or apply to vote at the polling place pursuant to NRS 293.5772
to 293.5887, inclusive.
2. For a polling place established pursuant to NRS 293.3072,
an election board may perform its duty in serving registered voters
at the polling place in an election if the election board has before it
the roster for the county.
3. If a county clerk uses an electronic roster, not earlier than [2]
6 weeks before and not later than 5 p.m. on the day before the first
day of the period for early voting by personal appearance, the
county clerk shall complete a test of the electronic roster to ensure
its functionality in accordance with regulations adopted by the
Secretary of State.
Sec. 23. NRS 293.3025 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3025 The Secretary of State and each county and city clerk
shall ensure that a copy of each of the following is posted in a
conspicuous place at each polling place on election day:
1. A sample ballot;
2. Information concerning the date and hours of operation of
the polling place;
3. Instructions for voting and casting a ballot, including a
provisional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive,
or a [provisional] conditional ballot pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to
293.5887, inclusive;
4. Instructions concerning the identification required for
persons who registered by mail or computer and are first-time voters
for federal office in this State;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 19 –
5. Information concerning the accessibility of polling places to
persons with disabilities;
6. General information concerning federal and state laws which
prohibit acts of fraud and misrepresentation; and
7. Information concerning the eligibility of a candidate, a ballot
question or any other matter appearing on the ballot as a result of a
judicial determination or by operation of law, if any.
Sec. 24. NRS 293.303 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.303 1. A person applying to vote may be challenged:
(a) Orally by any registered voter of the precinct upon the
ground that he or she is not the person entitled to vote as claimed or
has voted before at the same election. A registered voter who
initiates a challenge pursuant to this paragraph must submit an
affirmation that is signed under penalty of perjury and in the form
prescribed by the Secretary of State stating that the challenge is
based on the personal knowledge of the registered voter.
(b) On any ground set forth in a challenge filed with the county
clerk pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.547.
2. If a person is challenged, an election board officer shall
tender the challenged person the following oath or affirmation:
(a) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
does not belong to the political party designated upon the roster, “I
swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I belong to the political
party designated upon the roster”;
(b) If the challenge is on the ground that the roster does not
show that the challenged person designated the political party to
which he or she claims to belong, “I swear or affirm under penalty
of perjury that I designated on the application to register to vote the
political party to which I claim to belong”;
(c) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
does not reside at the residence for which the address is listed in the
roster, “I swear or affirm under penalty of perjury that I reside at the
residence for which the address is listed in the roster”;
(d) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person
previously voted a ballot for the election, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I have not voted for any of the candidates or
questions included on this ballot for this election”; or
(e) If the challenge is on the ground that the challenged person is
not the person he or she claims to be, “I swear or affirm under
penalty of perjury that I am the person whose name is in this roster.”
 The oath or affirmation must be set forth on a form prepared by
the Secretary of State and signed by the challenged person under
penalty of perjury.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 20 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if the
challenged person refuses to execute the oath or affirmation so
tendered, the person must not be issued a ballot, and the election
board officer shall indicate in the roster “Challenged” by the
person’s name.
4. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation set forth in paragraph (a) or (b) of subsection 2, the
election board officers shall issue the person a nonpartisan ballot.
5. If the challenged person refuses to execute the oath or
affirmation set forth in paragraph (c) of subsection 2, the election
board officers shall inform the person that he or she is entitled to
vote only in the manner prescribed in NRS 293.304.
6. If the challenged person executes the oath or affirmation and
the challenge is not based on the ground set forth in paragraph (e) of
subsection 2, the election board officers shall issue the person a
partisan ballot.
7. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(c) of subsection 2, and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
until he or she furnishes satisfactory identification which contains
proof of the address at which the person actually resides. For the
purposes of this subsection, a voter registration card does not
provide proof of the address at which a person resides.
8. If the challenge is based on the ground set forth in paragraph
(e) of subsection 2 and the challenged person executes the oath or
affirmation, the election board shall not issue the person a ballot
unless the person:
(a) Furnishes official identification which contains a photograph
of the person, such as a driver’s license or other official document;
or
(b) Brings before the election board officers a person who is at
least 18 years of age who:
(1) Furnishes official identification which contains a
photograph of that person, such as a driver’s license or other official
document; and
(2) Executes an oath or affirmation under penalty of perjury
that the challenged person is who he or she swears to be.
9. The election board officers shall:
(a) Record on the challenge list:
(1) The name of the challenged person;
(2) The name of the registered voter who initiated the
challenge; and
(3) The result of the challenge; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 21 –
(b) If possible, orally notify the registered voter who initiated
the challenge of the result of the challenge.
10. For the purposes of this section, “personal knowledge”
means firsthand knowledge through experience or observation of
the facts upon each ground that the challenge is based. The term
does not include knowledge obtained from a third party, including,
without limitation, information obtained from the review of data in
a database or other compilation of information.
Sec. 25. NRS 293.3073 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3073 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, if
a county clerk establishes one or more polling places pursuant to
NRS 293.3072, the county clerk must:
(a) Publish during the week before the election [in a newspaper
of general circulation] a notice of the location of each such polling
place. The county clerk may make this publication in such a
manner as the county clerk deems proper which may include,
without limitation, publication in a newspaper of general
circulation, on the Internet website of the county clerk or on the
social media account of the county clerk.
(b) Post a list of the location of each such polling place on any
bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the board of
county commissioners. The list must be posted continuously for a
period beginning not later than the fifth business day before the
election and ending at 7 p.m. on the day of the election. The county
clerk shall make copies of the list available to the public during the
period of posting in reasonable quantities without charge.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply if every polling
place in the county is a polling place where any person entitled to
vote in the county by personal appearance may do so on the day of
the primary election or general election.
3. No additional polling place may be established pursuant to
NRS 293.3072 after the publication pursuant to this section, except
in the case of an emergency and if approved by the Secretary of
State.
Sec. 26. NRS 293.3078 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3078 As used in NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive,
unless the context otherwise requires:
1. “Provisional ballot” means a provisional ballot cast by a
person pursuant to NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive.
2. The term does not include a [provisional] conditional ballot
cast by a person pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 22 –
Sec. 27. NRS 293.3576 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.3576 1. The county clerk shall publish during the week
before the period for early voting and at least once each week during
the period for early voting [in a newspaper of general circulation] a
schedule stating [:
(a) The] the location of each permanent and temporary polling
place for early voting [.
(b) The] and the dates and hours that early voting will be
conducted at each location. The county clerk may make this
publication in such a manner as the county clerk deems proper
which may include, without limitation, publication in a newspaper
of general circulation, on the Internet website of the county clerk
or on the social media account of the county clerk.
2. The county clerk shall post a copy of the schedule on the
bulletin board used for posting notice of meetings of the board of
county commissioners. The schedule must be posted continuously
for a period beginning not later than the fifth day before the first day
of the period for early voting by personal appearance and ending on
the last day of that period.
3. The county clerk shall make copies of the schedule available
to the public in reasonable quantities without charge during the
period of posting.
4. No additional polling places for early voting may be
established after the schedule is published pursuant to this section.
5. The hours that early voting will be conducted at each polling
place for early voting may be extended at the discretion of the
county clerk after the schedule is published pursuant to this section.
Sec. 28. NRS 293.391 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.391 1. The voted ballots, rejected ballots, spoiled ballots,
challenge lists, records printed on paper of voted ballots collected
pursuant to NRS 293B.400, reports prepared pursuant to NRS
293.269937 and stubs of the ballots used, enclosed and sealed, must,
after canvass of the votes by the board of county commissioners, be
deposited in the vaults of the county clerk. The records of voted
ballots that are maintained in electronic form must, after canvass of
the votes by the board of county commissioners, be sealed and
deposited in the vaults of the county clerk. The tally lists collected
pursuant to this title must, after canvass of the votes by the board of
county commissioners, be deposited in the vaults of the county clerk
without being sealed. All materials described by this subsection
must be preserved for at least 22 months, and all such sealed
materials must be destroyed immediately after the preservation
period. A notice of the destruction must , not less than 2 weeks
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 23 –
before the destruction, be published by the clerk in such a manner
as the county clerk deems proper which may include, without
limitation, publication in at least one newspaper of general
circulation in the county [not less than 2 weeks before] , on the
Internet website of the county clerk or on the social media account
of the [destruction.] county clerk.
2. Unused ballots, enclosed and sealed, must, after canvass of
the votes by the board of county commissioners, be deposited in the
vaults of the county clerk and preserved for at least the period
during which the election may be contested and adjudicated, after
which the unused ballots may be destroyed.
3. The rosters containing the signatures of those persons who
voted in the election and the tally lists deposited with the board of
county commissioners are subject to the inspection of any elector
who may wish to examine them at any time after their deposit with
the county clerk.
4. A contestant of an election may inspect all of the material
regarding that election which is preserved pursuant to subsection 1
or 2, except the voted ballots and records printed on paper of voted
ballots collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 which are deposited
with the county clerk.
5. The voted ballots and records printed on paper of voted
ballots collected pursuant to NRS 293B.400 which are deposited
with the county clerk are not subject to the inspection of anyone,
except in cases of a contested election, and then only by the judge,
body or board before whom the election is being contested, or by the
parties to the contest, jointly, pursuant to an order of such judge,
body or board.
Sec. 29. NRS 293.394 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.394 1. The Secretary of State shall adopt regulations for
conducting [a risk-limiting] an election accuracy audit of an
election, which may include, without limitation:
(a) Procedures to conduct [a risk-limiting] an election accuracy
audit;
(b) Criteria for which elections must be audited; and
(c) Criteria to determine the scope of the [risk-limiting] election
accuracy audit.
2. In accordance with the regulations adopted by the Secretary
of State pursuant to this section, each county clerk shall conduct [a
risk-limiting] an election accuracy audit of the results of an
election.
3. As used in this section, [“risk-limiting] “election accuracy
audit” means an audit protocol that:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 24 –
(a) Makes use of statistical principles and methods; and
(b) Is designed to limit the risk of certifying an incorrect
election outcome.
Sec. 30. NRS 293.403 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.403 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.424, a
candidate defeated at any election may demand and receive a
recount of the vote for the office for which he or she is a candidate
to determine the number of votes received for the candidate and the
number of votes received for the person who won the election if,
within 3 working days after the canvass of the vote and the
certification by the county clerk or city clerk of the abstract of votes,
the candidate who demands the recount:
(a) Files in writing a demand with the officer with whom the
candidate filed his or her declaration of candidacy; and
(b) Deposits in advance the estimated costs of the recount with
that officer.
2. Any voter at an election may demand and receive a recount
of the vote for a ballot question if, within 3 working days after the
canvass of the vote and the certification by the county clerk or city
clerk of the abstract of votes, the voter:
(a) Files in writing a demand with:
(1) The Secretary of State, if the demand is for a recount of a
ballot question affecting more than one county; or
(2) The county or city clerk who will conduct the recount, if
the demand is for a recount of a ballot question affecting only one
county or city; and
(b) Deposits in advance the estimated costs of the recount with
the person to whom the demand was made.
3. The estimated costs of the recount must be determined by
the person with whom the advance is deposited based on regulations
adopted by the Secretary of State defining the term “costs.”
4. As used in this section, “canvass” means:
(a) In any primary election, the canvass by the board of county
commissioners of the returns for a candidate or ballot question voted
for in one county or the canvass by the board of county
commissioners last completing its canvass of the returns for a
candidate or ballot question voted for in more than one county.
(b) In any primary city election, the canvass by the city council
of the returns for a candidate or ballot question voted for in the city.
(c) In any general election:
(1) The canvass by the Supreme Court of the returns for a
candidate for United States Senator, Representative in Congress or
a statewide office or a statewide ballot question; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 25 –
(2) The canvass of the board of county commissioners of the
returns for any other candidate or ballot question, as provided in
paragraph (a).
(d) In any general city election, the canvass by the city council
of the returns for a candidate or ballot question voted for in the city.
Sec. 31. NRS 293.464 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.464 1. If a court of competent jurisdiction orders a
county to extend the deadline for voting beyond the statutory
deadline in a particular election, the county clerk shall, as soon as
practicable after receiving notice of the court’s decision:
(a) Cause notice of the extended deadline to be published in
such a manner as the county clerk deems proper which may
include, without limitation, publication in a newspaper of general
circulation in the county [;] , on the Internet website of the county
clerk or on the social media account of the county clerk; and
(b) Transmit a notice of the extended deadline to each registered
voter who received a mail ballot for the election and has not
returned the mail ballot before the date on which the notice will be
transmitted.
2. The notice required pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
must be published:
(a) In a county whose population is 52,000 or more, on at least 3
successive days.
(b) In a county whose population is less than 52,000, at least
twice in successive issues of the newspaper [.] or, if the notice is
not published in a newspaper, on at least 2 successive days.
Sec. 32. NRS 293.4695 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.4695 1. Each county clerk shall collect the following
information regarding each primary election, presidential preference
primary election and general election, on a form provided by the
Secretary of State and made available at each polling place in the
county, each polling place for early voting in the county, the office
of the county clerk and any other location deemed appropriate by
the Secretary of State:
(a) The number of ballots that have been discarded or for any
reason not included in the final canvass of votes, along with an
explanation for the exclusion of each such ballot from the final
canvass of votes.
(b) A report on each malfunction of any mechanical voting
system, including, without limitation:
(1) Any known reason for the malfunction;
(2) The length of time during which the mechanical voting
system could not be used;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 26 –
(3) Any remedy for the malfunction which was used at the
time of the malfunction; and
(4) Any effect the malfunction had on the election process.
(c) A list of each polling place not open during the time
prescribed pursuant to NRS 293.273 and an account explaining why
each such polling place was not open during the time prescribed
pursuant to NRS 293.273.
(d) A description of each challenge made to the eligibility of a
voter pursuant to NRS 293.303 and the result of each such
challenge.
(e) A description of each complaint regarding a ballot cast by
mail or facsimile filed with the county clerk and the resolution, if
any, of the complaint.
(f) The results of any audit of election procedures and practices
conducted pursuant to regulations adopted by the Secretary of State
pursuant to this chapter.
(g) The number of provisional ballots cast pursuant to NRS
293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive, and the reason for the casting of
each such provisional ballot.
(h) The number of [provisional] conditional ballots cast
pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
2. Each county clerk shall submit to the Secretary of State, on a
form provided by the Secretary of State, the information collected
pursuant to subsection 1 not more than 60 days after each primary
election, presidential preference primary election and general
election.
3. The Secretary of State may contact any political party and
request information to assist in the investigation of any allegation of
voter intimidation.
4. The Secretary of State shall establish and maintain an
Internet website pursuant to which the Secretary of State shall solicit
and collect voter comments regarding election processes.
5. The Secretary of State shall compile the information and
comments collected pursuant to this section into a report and shall
submit the report to the Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau
for transmission to the Legislature not sooner than 30 days before
and not later than 30 days after the first day of each regular session
of the Legislature.
6. The Secretary of State may make the report required
pursuant to subsection 5 available on an Internet website established
and maintained by the Secretary of State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 27 –
Sec. 33. NRS 293.535 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.535 1. The county clerk shall notify a registrant if any
elector or other reliable person files an affidavit with the county
clerk stating that:
(a) The registrant is not a citizen of the United States; or
(b) The registrant has:
(1) Moved outside the boundaries of the county where he or
she is registered to another county, state, territory or foreign
country, with the intention of remaining there for an indefinite time
and with the intention of abandoning his or her residence in the
county where registered; and
(2) Established residence in some other state, territory or
foreign country, or in some other county of this state, naming the
place.
 The affiant must state that he or she has personal knowledge of
the facts set forth in the affidavit.
2. Upon the filing of an affidavit pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subsection 1, the county clerk shall notify the registrant in the
manner set forth in NRS 293.530 and shall enclose a copy of the
affidavit. If the registrant fails to respond or appear to vote within
the required time, the county clerk shall cancel the registration.
3. An affidavit filed pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1
must be filed not later than 30 days before an election. Upon the
filing of such an affidavit, the county clerk shall notify the registrant
by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, of the filing
of the affidavit, and shall enclose a copy of the affidavit. Unless the
registrant, within 15 days after the return receipt has been filed in
the office of the county clerk, presents satisfactory proof of
citizenship, the county clerk shall cancel the registration.
4. The provisions of this section do not prevent the challenge
provided for in NRS 293.303 or 293C.292.
5. A county clerk is not required to take any action pursuant to
this section in relation to a person who is preregistered to vote until
the person is deemed to be registered to vote pursuant to subsection
2 of NRS 293.4855.
6. For the purposes of this section, “personal knowledge”
means firsthand knowledge through experience or observation of
the facts upon each ground that the challenge is based. The term
does not include knowledge obtained from a third party, including,
without limitation, information obtained from the review of data in
a database or other compilation of information.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 28 –
Sec. 34. NRS 293.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.540 1. The county clerk shall cancel the preregistration
of a person:
(a) If the county clerk becomes aware of the death of the
person through any of the following methods:
(1) The county clerk has personal knowledge of the death of
the person ;
(2) The county clerk receives, from a person who is within
the second degree of consanguinity to the person, a sworn
affidavit which indicates the death of the person; or [if an]
(3) An authenticated certificate of the death of the person is
filed in the county clerk’s office.
(b) At the request of the person.
(c) If the county clerk has discovered an incorrect preregistration
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.5235 and the person has
failed to respond within the required time.
(d) As required by NRS 293.541.
(e) Upon verification that the application to preregister to vote is
a duplicate if the county clerk has the original or another duplicate
of the application on file in the county clerk’s office.
2. The county clerk shall cancel the registration of a person:
(a) If the county clerk becomes aware of the death of the
person through any of the following methods:
(1) The county clerk has personal knowledge of the death of
the person ;
(2) The county clerk receives, from a person who is within
the second degree of consanguinity to the voter, a sworn affidavit
which indicates the death of the voter; or [if an]
(3) An authenticated certificate of the death of the person is
filed in the county clerk’s office.
(b) If the county clerk is provided a certified copy of a court
order stating that the court specifically finds by clear and convincing
evidence that the person lacks the mental capacity to vote because
he or she cannot communicate, with or without accommodations, a
specific desire to participate in the voting process.
(c) Upon the determination that the person has been convicted of
a felony and is currently incarcerated.
(d) Upon the production of a certified copy of the judgment of
any court directing the cancellation to be made.
(e) At the request of the person.
(f) If the county clerk has discovered an incorrect registration
pursuant to the provisions of NRS 293.5235, 293.530 or 293.535
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 29 –
and the elector has failed to respond or appear to vote within the
required time.
(g) As required by NRS 293.541.
(h) Upon verification that the application to register to vote is a
duplicate if the county clerk has the original or another duplicate of
the application on file in the county clerk’s office.
Sec. 35. NRS 293.543 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.543 1. If the registration of an elector is cancelled
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 293.540, the
county clerk shall reregister the elector upon notice from the clerk of
the district court that the elector has been found by the district court
to have the mental capacity to vote. The court must include the
finding in a court order and, not later than 30 days after issuing
the order, provide a certified copy of the order to the county clerk of
the county in which the person is a resident and to the Office of the
Secretary of State.
2. If the registration of an elector is cancelled pursuant to
paragraph (c) of subsection 2 of NRS 293.540, the elector may
reregister upon release from prison.
3. If the registration of an elector is cancelled pursuant to the
provisions of paragraph (e) of subsection 2 of NRS 293.540, after
the close of registration for a primary election, the elector may not
reregister until after the primary election.
4. If the registration or preregistration of an elector is
cancelled pursuant to subparagraph (2) of paragraph (a) of
subsection 1 of NRS 293.540 or subparagraph (2) of paragraph
(a) of subsection 2 of NRS 293.540 and the county clerk later
determines that the registration or preregistration should not have
been cancelled, the county clerk shall reregister or repreregister
the elector, as applicable.
5. A county clerk shall not require an elector to present
evidence, including, without limitation, a court order or any other
document, to prove that the elector satisfies the requirements of
subsection 2.
Sec. 36. NRS 293.560 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.560 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293.269951, 293.502, 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, 293D.230
and 293D.300:
(a) For a primary election, presidential preference primary
election or general election, or a recall or special election that is held
on the same day as a primary election, presidential preference
primary election or general election, the last day to register to vote:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 30 –
(1) By mail is the fourth Tuesday preceding the primary
election, presidential preference primary election or general
election.
(2) By appearing in person at the office of the county clerk
or, if open, a county facility designated pursuant to NRS 293.5035,
is the [fourth Tuesday preceding] day before the first day of the
period for early voting by personal appearance for the primary
election, presidential preference primary election or general
election.
(3) By computer using the system established by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671, is the day of the
primary election, presidential preference primary election or general
election.
(b) If a recall or special election is not held on the same day as a
primary election, presidential preference primary election or general
election, the last day to register to vote for the recall or special
election [by any method of registration] :
(1) By mail is the second Tuesday preceding the recall or
special election.
(2) By appearing in person at the office of the county clerk
or, if open, a county facility designated pursuant to NRS 293.5035,
is :
(I) If there is a period for early voting for the recall or
special election, the day before the first day of the period for early
voting by personal appearance for the recall or special election; or
(II) If there is not a period for early voting for the recall
or special election, the third Saturday preceding the recall or
special election.
(3) By computer using the system established by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671 is the day of the recall
or special election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive, after the deadlines for the close of registration for a
primary election, presidential preference primary election or general
election set forth in subsection 1, no person may register to vote for
the election.
3. Except for a recall or special election held pursuant to
chapter 306 or 350 of NRS:
(a) The county clerk of each county shall cause a notice signed
by him or her to be published in a newspaper having a general
circulation in the county indicating:
(1) The day and time that each method of registration for the
election, as set forth in subsection 1, will be closed; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 31 –
(2) If the county clerk has designated a county facility
pursuant to NRS 293.5035, the location of that facility.
 If no such newspaper is published in the county, the publication
may be made in a newspaper of general circulation published in the
nearest county in this State.
(b) The notice must be published once each week for 4
consecutive weeks next preceding the day that the last method of
registration for the election, as set forth in subsection 1, will be
closed.
4. The offices of the county clerk, a county facility designated
pursuant to NRS 293.5035 and other ex officio registrars may
remain open on the last Friday in October in each even-numbered
year.
5. A county facility designated pursuant to NRS 293.5035 may
be open during the periods described in this section for such hours
of operation as the county clerk may determine, as set forth in
subsection 3 of NRS 293.5035.
Sec. 37. NRS 293.5727 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5727 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
Department of Motor Vehicles shall provide an application to
preregister or register to vote to each person who applies for the
issuance or renewal of any type of driver’s license or identification
card issued by the Department.
2. The county clerk shall use the applications to preregister or
register to vote which are signed and completed pursuant to
subsection 1 to preregister or register an applicant to vote or to
correct the preregistration or registration of the applicant, as
applicable. An application that is not signed must not be used to
preregister or register or correct the preregistration or registration of
the applicant.
3. For the purposes of this section, each employee specifically
authorized to do so by the Director of the Department may oversee
the completion of an application. The authorized employee shall
check the application for completeness and verify the information
required by the application. Each application must include a
duplicate copy or receipt to be retained by the applicant upon
completion of the form. The Department shall, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, forward each application on a weekly
basis to the county clerk or, if applicable, to the registrar of voters of
the county in which the applicant resides. The applications must be
forwarded daily during the 2 weeks immediately preceding the last
[day to register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 32 –
293C.527, as applicable.] date that the county clerk is required to
accept such an application pursuant to subsection 5.
4. The Department is not required to provide an application to
register to vote pursuant to subsection 1 to a person who declines to
apply to register to vote pursuant to this section and submits to the
Department a written form that meets the requirements of 52 U.S.C.
§ 20506(a)(6). Information related to the declination to apply to
register to vote must not be used for any purpose other than voter
registration.
5. The county clerk shall accept any application to:
(a) Preregister to vote at any time.
(b) Register to vote which is obtained from the Department of
Motor Vehicles pursuant to this section and completed by :
(1) If there is a period for early voting, the day before the
first day of the period for early voting by personal appearance; or
(2) If there is not a period for early voting, the last day to
register to vote by mail pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527, as
applicable,
 if the county clerk receives the application not later than 5 days
after that date.
6. Upon receipt of an application, the county clerk or field
registrar of voters shall determine whether the application is
complete. If the county clerk or field registrar of voters determines
that the application is complete, he or she shall notify the applicant
and the applicant shall be deemed to be preregistered or registered
as of the date of the submission of the application. If the county
clerk or field registrar of voters determines that the application is not
complete, he or she shall notify the applicant of the additional
information required. The applicant shall be deemed to be
preregistered or registered as of the date of the initial submission of
the application if the additional information is provided within 15
days after the notice for the additional information is mailed. If the
applicant has not provided the additional information within 15 days
after the notice for the additional information is mailed, the
incomplete application is void. Any notification required by this
subsection must be given by mail at the mailing address on the
application not more than 7 working days after the determination is
made concerning whether the application is complete.
7. The county clerk shall use any form submitted to the
Department to correct information on a driver’s license or
identification card to correct information on a previous application
to preregister or register unless the person indicates on the form that
the correction is not to be used for the purposes of preregistration or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 33 –
voter registration. The Department shall forward each such form to
the county clerk or, if applicable, to the registrar of voters of the
county in which the person resides in the same manner provided by
subsection 3 for applications to preregister or register to vote.
8. Upon receipt of a form to correct information, the county
clerk shall compare the information to that contained in the database
created by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.675. The
county clerk shall correct the information to reflect any changes
indicated on the form. After making any changes, the county clerk
shall notify the person by mail that the records have been corrected.
9. The Secretary of State shall, with the approval of the
Director, adopt regulations to:
(a) Establish any procedure necessary to provide a person who
applies to preregister to vote or an elector who applies to register to
vote pursuant to this section the opportunity to do so;
(b) Prescribe the contents of any forms or applications which the
Department is required to distribute pursuant to this section; and
(c) Provide for the transfer of the completed applications of
preregistration or registration from the Department to the
appropriate county clerk.
Sec. 38. NRS 293.5782 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5782 “Final verification” means the procedures established
pursuant to NRS 293.5872 to verify and determine whether a person
who cast a [provisional] conditional ballot was qualified to register
to vote and to cast the ballot in the election.
Sec. 39. NRS 293.5792 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5792 1. [“Provisional] “Conditional ballot” means a
[provisional] conditional ballot cast by a person pursuant to NRS
293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
2. The term does not include a provisional ballot cast by a
person pursuant to:
(a) NRS 293.3078 to 293.3086, inclusive; or
(b) Section 302 of the Help America Vote Act of 2002, 52
U.S.C. § 21082, as amended.
Sec. 40. NRS 293.5832 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5832 1. After the close of registration for an election
pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527, a registered voter may
update his or her voter registration information, including, without
limitation, his or her name, address and party affiliation.
2. The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the
following methods for a registered voter to update his or her voter
registration information pursuant to this section:
(a) A paper application; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 34 –
(b) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant to
NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
3. If a registered voter updates his or her voter registration
information pursuant to this section and applies to vote in the
election, the county or city clerk may require the voter to cast a
[provisional] conditional ballot in the election if any circumstances
exist that give the county or city clerk reasonable cause to believe
that the use of a [provisional] conditional ballot is necessary to
provide sufficient time to verify and determine whether the voter is
eligible to cast the ballot in the election based on his or her updated
voter registration information.
4. If a registered voter casts a [provisional] conditional ballot
in the election pursuant to this section, the [provisional] conditional
ballot is subject to final verification in accordance with the
procedures that apply to other [provisional] conditional ballots cast
in the election pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive.
Sec. 41. NRS 293.5837 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5837 1. An elector may register to vote in the county or
city, as applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote by
submitting an application to register to vote by computer using the
system established by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
293.671 before the elector appears at a polling place described in
subsection 2 to vote in person.
2. If an elector submits an application to register to vote
pursuant to this section less than [14] 18 days before the election,
the elector may vote only in person:
(a) During the period for early voting, at any polling place for
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote; or
(b) On the day of the election, at:
(1) A polling place established pursuant to NRS 293.3072 or
293C.3032 in the county or city, as applicable, in which the elector
is eligible to vote; or
(2) The polling place for his or her election precinct.
3. To vote in person, an elector who submits an application to
register to vote pursuant to this section must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place described
in subsection 2;
(b) Inform an election board officer that, before appearing at the
polling place, the elector submitted an application to register to vote
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 35 –
by computer using the system established by the Secretary of State
pursuant to NRS 293.671; and
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as proof of the elector’s identity and residency.
4. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
5. Subject to final verification, if an elector submits an
application to register to vote and appears at a polling place to vote
in person pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the elector submitted the
application to register to vote by computer using the system
established by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671 and
that the application to register to vote is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a [provisional] conditional ballot,
unless it is verified, at that time, that the elector is qualified to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 36 –
register to vote and to cast a regular ballot in the election at that
polling place.
Sec. 42. NRS 293.5842 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5842 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person at any polling place for
early voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as
applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote in person during the period for early
voting, an elector must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place for early
voting by personal appearance in the county or city, as applicable, in
which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as proof of the elector’s identity and residency.
3. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 37 –
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. Subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in
person at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a [provisional] conditional ballot,
unless it is verified, at that time, that the elector is qualified to
register to vote and to cast a regular ballot in the election at that
polling place.
Sec. 43. NRS 293.5847 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5847 1. Notwithstanding the close of any method of
registration for an election pursuant to NRS 293.560 or 293C.527,
an elector may register to vote in person on the day of the election at
any polling place in the county or city, as applicable, in which the
elector is eligible to vote.
2. To register to vote on the day of the election, an elector
must:
(a) Appear before the close of polls at a polling place in the
county or city, as applicable, in which the elector is eligible to vote.
(b) Complete the application to register to vote by a method
authorized by the county or city clerk pursuant to this paragraph.
The county or city clerk shall authorize at least one of the following
methods for a person to register to vote pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) A paper application; or
(2) The system established by the Secretary of State pursuant
to NRS 293.671.
 If the county or city clerk authorizes the use of both methods, the
county or city clerk may limit the use of one method to
circumstances when the other method is not reasonably available.
(c) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, provide his or
her current and valid driver’s license or identification card issued by
the Department of Motor Vehicles which shows his or her physical
address as proof of the elector’s identity and residency.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 38 –
3. If the driver’s license or identification card issued by the
Department of Motor Vehicles to the elector does not have the
elector’s current residential address, the following documents may
be used to establish the residency of the elector if the current
residential address of the elector, as indicated on his or her
application to register to vote, is displayed on the document:
(a) A military identification card;
(b) A utility bill, including, without limitation, a bill for electric,
gas, oil, water, sewer, septic, telephone, cellular telephone or cable
television service;
(c) A bank or credit union statement;
(d) A paycheck;
(e) An income tax return;
(f) A statement concerning the mortgage, rental or lease of a
residence;
(g) A motor vehicle registration;
(h) A property tax statement; or
(i) Any other document issued by a governmental agency.
4. Subject to final verification, if an elector registers to vote in
person at a polling place pursuant to this section:
(a) The elector shall be deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place upon:
(1) The determination that the application to register to vote
is complete; and
(2) The verification of the elector’s identity and residency
pursuant to this section.
(b) After the elector is deemed to be conditionally registered to
vote at the polling place pursuant to paragraph (a), the elector:
(1) May vote in the election only at that polling place;
(2) Must vote as soon as practicable and before leaving that
polling place; and
(3) Must vote by casting a [provisional] conditional ballot.
Sec. 44. NRS 293.5852 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5852 If a person casts a [provisional] conditional ballot
pursuant to NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, the [provisional]
conditional ballot must include all offices, candidates and measures
upon which the person would have been entitled to vote if the
person had cast a regular ballot.
Sec. 45. NRS 293.5872 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5872 1. Each county and city clerk shall establish
procedures, approved by the Secretary of State, for:
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 39 –
(a) Carrying out final verification to verify and determine
whether a person who cast a [provisional] conditional ballot was
qualified to register to vote and to cast the ballot in the election; and
(b) Keeping each [provisional] conditional ballot separate from
other ballots until such final verification.
2. For the purposes of final verification:
(a) The Secretary of State shall verify that an elector has voted
in the election in only one county or city, as applicable, and provide
each county and city clerk with a copy of the verification report; and
(b) Each county and city clerk shall verify that an elector has
voted in the election at only one polling place in the county or city,
as applicable.
Sec. 46. NRS 293.5877 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5877 1. Following each election, a canvass of the
[provisional] conditional ballots cast in the election must be
conducted pursuant to NRS 293.387 and 293C.387.
2. The county or city clerk shall not include any [provisional]
conditional ballot in the unofficial results reported on election night.
3. Beginning on the day following the election, the county or
city clerk shall regularly report the results of the counting of the
[provisional] conditional ballots until such counting is completed.
Sec. 47. NRS 293.5882 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.5882 1. The Secretary of State shall establish a free
access system, such as a toll-free telephone number or an Internet
website, to inform a person who cast a [provisional] conditional
ballot whether the person’s ballot was counted and, if the ballot was
not counted, the reason why the ballot was not counted.
2. The free access system must ensure secrecy of the ballot
while protecting the confidentiality and integrity of personal
information contained therein.
3. Access to information concerning a [provisional]
conditional ballot must be restricted to the person who cast the
[provisional] conditional ballot.
Sec. 48. NRS 293.730 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.730 1. Except for an election board officer in the course
of the election board officer’s official duties, a person shall not:
(a) Remain in or outside of any polling place so as to interfere
with the conduct of the election. The provisions of this paragraph
do not prohibit a person from conducting an exit poll in or outside
of the polling place.
(b) Accept from any voter a ballot prepared by or on behalf of
the voter, other than a mail ballot or military-overseas ballot
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 40 –
prepared by or on behalf of the voter with his or her authorization
pursuant to this title.
(c) Remove a ballot from any polling place before the closing of
the polls.
(d) Apply for or receive a ballot at any election precinct or
district other than one at which the person is entitled to vote.
(e) Show his or her ballot to another person, after voting, so as
to reveal any of his or her votes on the ballot, other than on his or
her mail ballot or military-overseas ballot prepared by or on behalf
of the voter with his or her authorization pursuant to this title.
(f) Inside a polling place, ask another person for his or her name,
address or political affiliation or for whom he or she intends to vote.
(g) Send, transmit, distribute or deliver a ballot to a voter, other
than a mail ballot or military-overseas ballot when permitted
pursuant to this title.
(h) Except when permitted by the voter, alter, change, deface,
damage or destroy a mail ballot or military-overseas ballot prepared
by or on behalf of the voter with his or her authorization pursuant to
this title.
2. A voter shall not:
(a) Accept a ballot from another person, other than an election
board officer in the course of the election board officer’s official
duties or a person who sends, transmits, distributes or delivers a
mail ballot or military-overseas ballot to the voter when permitted
pursuant to this title.
(b) Deliver to an election board officer in the course of the
election board officer’s official duties any ballot other than the one
received.
(c) Place any mark upon his or her ballot by which it may
afterward be identified as the one that he or she voted, other than
any such mark that is permitted to be placed on a mail ballot or
military-overseas ballot prepared by or on behalf of the voter with
his or her authorization pursuant to this title.
3. A person other than a county or city clerk shall not set up a
ballot drop box that purports to be an official ballot drop box for
mail ballots.
4. Any person who violates any provision of this section is
guilty of a category E felony and shall be punished as provided in
NRS 193.130.
Sec. 49. NRS 293.740 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293.740 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, it is
unlawful inside a polling place, within 100 feet from the entrance to
the building or other structure in which a polling place is located,
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 41 –
inside the area of a county or city jail where a person detained in the
jail may vote or within 100 feet from the entrance of the area in a
jail where a person detained in the jail may vote:
(a) For any person to solicit a vote or speak to a voter on the
subject of marking the voter’s ballot [.] unless the person is
conducting an exit poll.
(b) For any person, including an election board officer, to do
any electioneering on election day.
 The county clerk or registrar of voters shall ensure that, at the
outer limits of the area within which electioneering is prohibited,
notices are continuously posted on which are printed in large letters
“Distance Marker: No electioneering between this point and the
entrance to the polling place.”
2. The county clerk shall ensure that any notice posted
pursuant to subsection 1 is:
(a) At least 17 inches by 11 inches in size;
(b) Placed on a window or door of the polling place or a
freestanding sign; and
(c) Visible to a person approaching the outer limits of the area
within which electioneering is prohibited pursuant to subsection 1.
3. The provisions of subsections 1 and 2 do not apply to the
conduct of a person in a private residence or on commercial or
residential property that is within 100 feet from the entrance to a
building or other structure in which a polling place is located. The
provisions of subsection 1 are not intended to prohibit a person from
voting solely because he or she is wearing a prohibited political
insigne and is reasonably unable to remove the insigne or cover it.
In such a case, the election board officer shall take such action as is
necessary to allow the voter to vote as expediently as possible and
then assist the voter in exiting the polling place as soon as is
possible.
4. Any person who violates any provision of this section is
guilty of a gross misdemeanor.
5. As used in this section, “electioneering” means campaigning
for or against a candidate, ballot question or political party by:
(a) Posting signs relating to the support of or opposition to a
candidate, ballot question or political party;
(b) Distributing literature relating to the support of or opposition
to a candidate, ballot question or political party;
(c) Using loudspeakers to broadcast information relating to the
support of or opposition to a candidate, ballot question or political
party;
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 42 –
(d) Buying, selling, wearing or displaying any badge, button or
other insigne which expressly refers to any political party or a
candidate or ballot question to be voted upon at that election; or
(e) Soliciting signatures to any kind of petition.
Sec. 50. Chapter 293B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
If the board of county commissioners of any county or the city
council or other governing body of any city terminates a contract
for the lease or use of a mechanical voting system or mechanical
recording device which is currently used in any election, that
termination is provisional and does not become final unless the
board of county commissioners, city council or other governing
body:
1. Submits to the Secretary of State a plan to transition to a
new mechanical voting system or mechanical recording device, as
applicable, which is approved by the Secretary of State; and
2. Submits to the Secretary of State proof of a signed contract
for purchase, lease or use of the new mechanical voting system or
mechanical recording device, as applicable.
Sec. 51. NRS 293B.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.050 At all statewide, county, city and district elections of
any kind held in this State, ballots or votes [may] :
1. May be cast, registered [,] and recorded [and counted] by
means of a mechanical voting system.
2. Must be counted by means of a mechanical voting system.
Sec. 52. NRS 293B.105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.105 The board of county commissioners of any county or
the city council or other governing body of any city [may] :
1. May purchase and adopt for use at elections any mechanical
voting system and mechanical recording device [. The system or
device may be used at any or all elections held in the county or city,]
for voting [,] and registering [and counting] votes cast.
2. Must purchase and adopt for use at elections a mechanical
voting system for counting votes cast.
Sec. 53. NRS 293B.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.110 [A] Except as otherwise provided in NRS
293B.050, a mechanical voting system or mechanical recording
device may be adopted and used for some of the precincts or
districts in the same county or city, while the remainder of the
precincts or districts in that county or city may be furnished with
paper ballots or any other mechanical voting system or mechanical
recording device.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 43 –
Sec. 54. NRS 293B.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.130 1. Before any election , [where a mechanical
voting system is to be used,] the county clerk shall prepare or cause
to be prepared a computer program on cards, tape or other material
suitable for use with the computer or counting device to be
employed for counting the votes cast. The program must cause the
computer or counting device to operate in the following manner:
(a) All lawful votes cast by each voter must be counted.
(b) All unlawful votes, including, without limitation, overvotes
or, in a primary election or presidential preference primary election,
votes cast for a candidate of a major political party other than the
party, if any, of the registration of the voter must not be counted.
(c) If the election is:
(1) A primary election held in an even-numbered year;
(2) A presidential preference primary election; or
(3) A general election,
 the total votes, other than mail ballots, must be accumulated by
precinct.
(d) The computer or counting device must halt or indicate by
appropriate signal if a ballot is encountered which lacks a code
identifying the precinct in which it was voted and, in a primary
election or presidential preference primary election, identifying the
major political party of the voter.
2. The program must be prepared under the supervision of the
accuracy certification board appointed pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 293B.140.
3. The county clerk shall take such measures as he or she
deems necessary to protect the program from being altered or
damaged.
Sec. 55. NRS 293B.150 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.150 Not earlier than [2] 6 weeks before and not later than
5 p.m. on the day before the first day of early voting, the county or
city clerk shall test:
1. The mechanical recording device which directly records
votes electronically, if any; or
2. The automatic tabulating equipment and programs, if any,
 to ascertain that the device or equipment and programs will
correctly count the votes cast for all offices and on all measures.
Sec. 56. NRS 293B.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.170 1. After the completion of the last logic and
accuracy test, the programs used, if any, and the logic and accuracy
test ballots and the official ballots shall be sealed, retained and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 44 –
disposed of in the manner provided in NRS 293.391 or 293C.390
for other ballots.
2. All of the materials preserved pursuant to subsection 1
which are deposited with the county clerk are subject to inspection
in an election accuracy audit that is conducted in accordance with
the regulations adopted pursuant to NRS 293.394.
Sec. 57. NRS 293B.175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293B.175 In those districts or precincts in which a mechanical
voting system is used [,] for casting ballots, the list of offices and
candidates and the statements of measures appropriate for use with
[that] a mechanical voting system in combination with the device
upon which a vote is registered is an official ballot.
Secs. 58 and 59. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 59.5. NRS 293C.263 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.263 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the
city clerk shall prepare and distribute to each active registered voter
in the city and each person who registers to vote or updates his or
her voter registration information not later than the 14 days before
the election a mail ballot for every election. The city clerk shall
make reasonable accommodations for the use of the mail ballot by a
person who is elderly or disabled, including, without limitation, by
providing, upon request, the mail ballot in 12-point type to a person
who is elderly or disabled.
2. The city clerk shall allow a voter to elect not to receive a
mail ballot pursuant to this section by submitting to the city clerk a
written notice in the form prescribed by the city clerk which must be
received by the city clerk not later than 60 days before the day of the
election.
3. The city clerk shall not distribute a mail ballot to any person
who:
(a) Registers to vote for the election pursuant to the provisions
of NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive; or
(b) Elects not to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 2.
4. The mail ballot must include all offices, candidates and
measures upon which the voter is entitled to vote at the election.
5. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and 3, the
mail ballot must be distributed to:
(a) Each active registered voter who:
(1) Resides within the State, on or after the fifth Monday
before the election but not later than [20 days] the fourth Monday
before the election; and
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 45 –
(2) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b), resides
outside the State, not later than 40 days before the election.
(b) Each active registered voter who registers to vote after the
dates set for distributing mail ballots pursuant to paragraph (a) but
who is eligible to receive a mail ballot pursuant to subsection 1, not
later than 13 days before the election.
(c) Each covered voter who is entitled to have a military-
overseas ballot transmitted pursuant to the provisions of chapter
293D of NRS or the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee
Voting Act, 52 U.S.C. §§ 20301 et seq., not later than the time
required by those provisions.
6. In the case of a special election where no candidate for
federal office will appear on the ballot, the mail ballot must be
distributed to each active registered voter not later than 15 days
before the special election.
7. Any untimely legal action which would prevent the mail
ballot from being distributed to any voter pursuant to this section is
moot and of no effect.
Sec. 60. NRS 293C.26325 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26325 1. The [city clerk] Secretary of State shall
establish procedures for minimum requirements for the processing
and counting of mail ballots.
2. The procedures established pursuant to subsection 1:
(a) May authorize mail ballots to be processed, verified and
counted by computer or other electronic means; and
(b) Must not conflict with the provisions of NRS 293C.263 to
293C.26337, inclusive.
Sec. 61. NRS 293C.26331 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
293C.26331 1. The mail ballot central counting board [may]
shall begin counting the received mail ballots 15 days before the
day of the election [.] and must process each mail ballot pursuant
to NRS 293C.26333 within 24 hours after the receipt of the mail
ballot unless the Secretary of State grants a waiver requested
pursuant to subsection 2. The board must complete the count of all
mail ballots on or before the seventh day following the election. The
counting procedure must be public.
2. If a mail ballot central counting board is unable to process
a mail ballot within 24 hours after the receipt of the mail ballot,
the mail ballot central counting board may request a waiver from
the Secretary of State to extend the time that the mail ballot
central counting board has to process the mail ballot. A waiver
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 46 –
granted pursuant to this subsection must not authorize the mail
ballot central counting board to count the mail ballot after the
deadline for the completion of the count of all mail ballots set
forth in subsection 1.
3. If two or more mail ballots are found folded together to
present the appearance of a single ballot, the mail ballots must be
rejected and placed in an envelope, upon which must be written the
reason for their rejection. The envelope must be signed by an
election board officer and placed in the container or ballot box after
the count is completed.
Sec. 62. NRS 293C.527 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.527 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.502,
293.5772 to 293.5887, inclusive, 293D.230 and 293D.300:
(a) For a primary city election or general city election, or a recall
or special city election that is held on the same day as a primary city
election or general city election, the last day to register to vote:
(1) By mail is the fourth Tuesday preceding the primary city
election or general city election.
(2) By appearing in person at the office of the city clerk or, if
open, a municipal facility designated pursuant to NRS 293C.520, is
:
(I) If there is a period for early voting for the primary
city election or general city election, the day before the first day of
the period for early voting by personal appearance for the primary
city election or general city election; or
(II) If there is not a period for early voting for the
primary city election or general city election, the fourth Tuesday
preceding the primary city election or general city election.
(3) By computer using the system established by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671, is the day of the
primary city election or general city election.
(b) If a recall or special city election is not held on the same day
as a primary city election or general city election, the last day to
register to vote for the recall or special city election [by any method
of registration] :
(1) By mail is the second Tuesday preceding the recall or
special city election.
(2) By appearing in person at the office of the city clerk or,
if open, a municipal facility designated pursuant to NRS 293C.520
is :
(I) If there is a period for early voting for the recall or
special city election, the day before the first day of the period for
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 47 –
early voting by personal appearance for the recall or special city
election; or
(II) If there is not a period for early voting for the recall
or special city election, the third Saturday preceding the recall or
special city election.
(3) By computer using the system established by the
Secretary of State pursuant to NRS 293.671 is the day of the recall
or special city election.
2. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 293.5772 to 293.5887,
inclusive, after the deadlines for the close of registration for a
primary city election or general city election set forth in subsection
1, no person may register to vote for the election.
3. Except for a recall or special city election held pursuant to
chapter 306 or 350 of NRS:
(a) The city clerk of each city shall cause a notice signed by him
or her to be published in a newspaper having a general circulation in
the city indicating:
(1) The day and time that each method of registration for the
election, as set forth in subsection 1, will be closed; and
(2) If the city clerk has designated a municipal facility
pursuant to NRS 293C.520, the location of that facility.
 If no newspaper is of general circulation in that city, the
publication may be made in a newspaper of general circulation in
the nearest city in this State.
(b) The notice must be published once each week for 4
consecutive weeks next preceding the day on which the last method
of registration for the election, as set forth in subsection 1, will be
closed.
4. A municipal facility designated pursuant to NRS 293C.520
may be open during the periods described in this section for such
hours of operation as the city clerk may determine, as set forth in
subsection 3 of NRS 293C.520.
Sec. 63. NRS 293C.600 is hereby amended to read as follows:
293C.600 1. Before any election where a mechanical voting
system will be used [,] for casting ballots, the city clerk shall
prepare or cause to be prepared a computer program on cards, tape
or other material suitable for use with the computer or counting
device to be employed for counting the votes cast. The program
must cause the computer or counting device to operate in the
following manner:
(a) All lawful votes cast by each voter must be counted.
(b) All unlawful votes, including, but not limited to, overvotes
must not be counted.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 48 –
(c) The computer or counting device must halt or indicate by
appropriate signal if a ballot is encountered that lacks a code
identifying the precinct in which it was voted.
2. The program must be prepared under the supervision of the
accuracy certification board appointed pursuant to the provisions of
NRS 293B.140.
3. The city clerk shall take such measures as he or she deems
necessary to protect the program from being altered or damaged.
Sec. 64. NRS 295.045 is hereby amended to read as follows:
295.045 1. A petition for referendum must be filed with the
Secretary of State not less than 120 days before the date of the next
succeeding general election.
2. The Secretary of State shall certify the questions to the
county clerks.
3. The title of the statute or resolution must be set out on the
ballot, and the question printed upon the ballot for the information
of the voters must be as follows: “Shall the statute (setting out its
title) be approved?”
4. Where a mechanical voting system is used [,] for casting
ballots, the title of the statute must appear on the list of offices and
candidates and the statements of measures to be voted on and may
be condensed to no more than 25 words.
5. The votes cast upon the question must be counted and
canvassed as the votes for state officers are counted and canvassed.
Sec. 65. NRS 295.056 is hereby amended to read as follows:
295.056 1. Before a petition for initiative or referendum is
filed with the Secretary of State, the petitioners must submit to each
county clerk for verification pursuant to NRS 293.1276 to 293.1279,
inclusive, the document or documents which were circulated for
signature within the clerk’s county. The clerks shall give the person
submitting a document or documents a receipt stating the number of
documents and pages and the person’s statement of the number of
signatures contained therein.
2. If a petition for initiative proposes a statute or an amendment
to a statute, the document or documents must be submitted not later
than the 15th day following the general election.
3. If a petition for initiative proposes an amendment to the
Constitution, the document or documents must be submitted not
later than the 15th day following the primary election.
4. If the petition is for referendum, the document or documents
must be submitted not later than the 15th day following the primary
election.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 49 –
5. All documents which are submitted to a county clerk for
verification must be submitted at the same time. If documents
concerning the same petition are submitted for verification to more
than one county clerk, the documents must be submitted to each
county clerk on the same day. At the time that the petition is
submitted to a county clerk for verification, the petitioners may
designate a contact person who is authorized by the petitioners to
address questions or issues relating to the petition.
6. A county clerk may delay beginning verification pursuant
NRS 293.1276 to 293.1279, inclusive:
(a) If the petition is a petition for referendum or is a petition
for initiative that proposes an amendment to the Constitution, on
or after the second Friday before the period for early voting for a
primary election. If a county clerk delays verification pursuant to
this paragraph, the county clerk must begin verification not later
than the 15th day following the primary election.
(b) If the petition is a petition for initiative that proposes a
statute or an amendment to a statute, on or after the second
Friday before the period for early voting for a general election. If
a county clerk delays verification pursuant to this paragraph, the
county clerk must begin verification not later than the 15th day
following the general election.
Sec. 66. NRS 295.170 is hereby amended to read as follows:
295.170 1. The subject matter of such questions must be
stated concisely on the ballot, and the question printed upon the
ballot for the information of the voter must be as follows: “Shall the
act (setting out the title thereof) be approved?”
2. Where a mechanical voting system is used [,] for casting
ballots, the title of the act must appear on the list of offices and
candidates and the statements of measures to be voted on and may
be condensed by the district attorney to 20 words.
3. The district attorney shall prepare an explanation of each
such question, which must be placed on the ballot or the list of
offices and candidates and the statements of measures to be voted
on, or posted in the polling place.
4. The votes cast upon such question must be counted and
canvassed as the votes for county officers are counted and
canvassed.
Sec. 67. NRS 298.650 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.650 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection 2,]
this section, a presidential preference primary election must be held
for all major political parties on the first Tuesday in February of
each presidential election year.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 50 –
2. The Secretary of State may, with the approval of the
Legislative Commission, adjust the date of the presidential
preference primary election set forth in subsection 1.
3. A presidential preference primary election must not be held
for a major political party if only one qualified candidate or no
qualified candidate of the major political party files a declaration of
candidacy pursuant to NRS 298.660. If only one qualified candidate
of the major political party files a declaration of candidacy, the
Secretary of State must certify the name of the qualified candidate to
the state central committee and the national committee of the major
political party.
Sec. 68. NRS 298.670 is hereby amended to read as follows:
298.670 1. The Secretary of State shall forward to each
county clerk the name, party affiliation and mailing address of each
qualified candidate whose name must appear on the ballot for the
presidential preference primary election.
2. Immediately upon receipt by the county clerk of the list of
qualified candidates, the county clerk shall publish a notice of the
presidential preference primary election once a week for 2
successive weeks in such manner as the county clerk deems proper
which may include, without limitation, publication in a newspaper
of general circulation in the county [once a week for 2 successive
weeks. If no such newspaper is published in the county, the
publication may be made in a newspaper of general circulation
published in] or the nearest Nevada county [.] , on the Internet
website of the county clerk or on the social media account of the
county clerk. The notice must contain:
(a) The date of the presidential preference primary election;
(b) The major political parties that have qualified candidates
who will be on the ballot at the presidential preference primary
election;
(c) The location of the polling places in the county, including,
without limitation, polling places for early voting by personal
appearance; and
(d) The hours during which the polling places in the county will
be open for voting during the period for early voting and the day of
the presidential preference primary election.
Sec. 69. NRS 306.060 is hereby amended to read as follows:
306.060 1. If the officer against whom the petition is filed
furnishes no justification of the officer’s course in office, none need
appear on the ballot at the election upon the officer’s recall.
2. Where a mechanical voting system is used [,] for casting
ballots, the reason for demanding the recall of the officer and the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 51 –
officer’s justification need not be printed on the ballot, but must be
printed on sample ballots, which must be presented to registered
voters upon their application to vote.
Sec. 69.2. Chapter 225 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 69.4 and 69.6 of this act.
Sec. 69.4. 1. The Secretary of State shall establish and
administer the Voter Access Grant Program to provide grants of
money from the Account for the Voter Access Grant Program
created by section 69.6 of this act to eligible entities to support the
administration of elections and improve voter access.
2. The Secretary of State shall notify all eligible entities about
the Program and the requirements for eligible entities to apply for
and receive grants from the Program.
3. The amount of any grant awarded by the Secretary of State
to an eligible entity must be proportionate to the number of
qualified electors who reside within the jurisdiction of the eligible
entity unless the Secretary of State determines that awarding a
disproportionate amount to an eligible entity is necessary to
address a significant event that may affect voter participation in
an election.
4. In carrying out the Program, the Secretary of State may
award a grant to an eligible entity for:
(a) The purchase and maintenance of supplies or equipment
for an election;
(b) The payment of election board officers and other
employees who perform duties relating to elections;
(c) Programs for voter education and outreach; and
(d) Any other project, program or expense that the Secretary of
State determines to be eligible for the Program.
5. The Secretary of State, or his or her designee, shall review
each application submitted for a grant from the Program in
accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to subsection 8.
When reviewing an application, the Secretary of State, or his or
her designee, may request any additional information from an
applicant to determine the eligibility of the applicant for a grant.
6. Any grant awarded to an eligible entity pursuant to the
Program is in addition to and does not supplant or replace any
money, support or services otherwise authorized or required by
law to be provided to an eligible entity.
7. On or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Secretary of State shall prepare and submit a written report to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 52 –
the Legislature. The report must include, without limitation, for
the immediately preceding biennium:
(a) The number of eligible entities that applied for a grant
from the Program;
(b) The number of eligible entities that received a grant from
the Program;
(c) The number of eligible entities that applied for but did not
receive a grant from the Program;
(d) The amount and source of any donation, gift, grant,
bequest or other source of money that the Secretary of State
received for deposit in the Account for the Voter Access Grant
Program created by section 69.6 of this act;
(e) The total amount of grants awarded from the Program;
and
(f) A description of the projects, programs, supplies or
equipment that were purchased or supported, in whole or in part,
from the Program.
8. The Secretary of State shall adopt any regulations
necessary to carry out the provisions of this section, including,
without limitation, regulations that prescribe:
(a) The process for applying for a grant from the Program,
including, without limitation, application requirements;
(b) Criteria for eligibility for a grant from the Program;
(c) The order of priority for reviewing applications and
awarding grants from the Program; and
(d) Standards for determining whether to approve an
application for a grant from the Program.
9. For the purposes of this section, “eligible entity” means a
county, city or tribal government.
Sec. 69.6. 1. The Account for the Voter Access Grant
Program is hereby created in the State General Fund. The
Secretary of State shall administer the Account.
2. The Secretary of State may apply for and accept any
donation, gift, grant, bequest or other source of money for deposit
in the Account.
3. The interest and income earned on the money in the
Account, after deducting any applicable charges, must be credited
to the Account.
4. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 53 –
Sec. 70. Section 5.090 of the Charter of the City of Caliente,
being chapter 31, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 67, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.090 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The City Council [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or] counting the votes
[not inconsistent] in accordance with [law or] the election
laws of this State and any regulations of the Secretary of
State.
2. If the City Council provides for the use of
mechanical or other devices for voting, such provision must
be in accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 71. Section 5.080 of the Charter of the City of Carlin,
being chapter 344, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 616, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.080 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The Board of Council Members [may] shall provide
for the use of mechanical or other devices for [voting or]
counting the votes [not inconsistent] in accordance with [law
or] the election laws of this State and any regulations of the
Secretary of State.
2. If the Board of Council Members provides for the
use of mechanical or other devices for voting, such
provision must be in accordance with the election laws of
this State and any regulations of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 72. Section 5.090 of the Charter of Carson City, being
chapter 213, Statutes of Nevada 1969, at page 306, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.090 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The Board [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or] counting the votes
[not inconsistent] in accordance with [law or] the election
laws of this State and any regulations of the Secretary of
State.
2. If the Board provides for the use of mechanical or
other devices for voting, such provision must be in
accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 54 –
Sec. 73. Section 5.080 of the Charter of the City of Elko,
being chapter 276, Statutes of Nevada 1971, as amended by chapter
51, Statutes of Nevada 2001, at page 464, is hereby amended to read
as follows:
Sec. 5.080 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The City Council [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or] counting votes
[that is not inconsistent] in accordance with [law or] the
election laws of this State and any regulations of the
Secretary of State.
2. If the City Council provides for the use of
mechanical or other devices for voting, such provision must
be in accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 74. Section 5.090 of the Charter of the City of Henderson,
being chapter 266, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 417, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.090 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The City Council [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or] counting the votes
[not inconsistent] in accordance with [law or] the election
laws of this State and any regulations of the Secretary of
State.
2. If the City Council provides for the use of
mechanical or other devices for voting, such provision must
be in accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 75. Section 5.090 of the Charter of the City of Las Vegas,
being chapter 517, Statutes of Nevada 1983, at page 1416, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.090 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The City Council [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or for] counting the
votes [, or both, which are not inconsistent] in accordance
with the [law or the] election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
2. If the City Council provides for the use of
mechanical or other devices for voting, such provision must
be in accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 55 –
Sec. 76. Section 5.090 of the Charter of the City of Mesquite,
being chapter 325, Statutes of Nevada 2017, at page 1887, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.090 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The City Council [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or] counting the votes
[not inconsistent] in accordance with [law or] the election
laws of this State and any regulations of the Secretary of
State.
2. If the City Council provides for the use of
mechanical or other devices for voting, such provision must
be in accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 77. Section 5.090 of the Charter of the City of Reno,
being chapter 662, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 1979, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.090 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The City Council [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or] counting the votes
[not inconsistent] in accordance with [law or] the election
laws of this State and any regulations of the Secretary of
State.
2. If the City Council provides for the use of
mechanical or other devices for voting, such provision must
be in accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 78. Section 5.090 of the Charter of the City of Sparks,
being chapter 470, Statutes of Nevada 1975, at page 737, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.090 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The City Council [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or] counting the votes
[not inconsistent] in accordance with [law or] the election
laws of this State and any regulations of the Secretary of
State.
2. If the City Council provides for the use of
mechanical or other devices for voting, such provision must
be in accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 56 –
Sec. 79. Section 5.080 of the Charter of the City of Wells,
being chapter 275, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 470, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.080 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The Board of Council Members [may] shall provide
for the use of mechanical or other devices for [voting or]
counting the votes [not inconsistent] in accordance with [law
or] the election laws of this State and any regulations of the
Secretary of State.
2. If the Board of Council Members provides for the
use of mechanical or other devices for voting, such
provision must be in accordance with the election laws of
this State and any regulations of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 80. Section 5.080 of the Charter of the City of Yerington,
being chapter 465, Statutes of Nevada 1971, at page 913, is hereby
amended to read as follows:
Sec. 5.080 [Voting machines.] Mechanical voting
systems.
1. The City Council [may] shall provide for the use of
mechanical or other devices for [voting or] counting the votes
[not inconsistent] in accordance with [law or] the election
laws of this State and any regulations of the Secretary of
State.
2. If the City Council provides for the use of
mechanical or other devices for voting, such provision must
be in accordance with the election laws of this State and any
regulations of the Secretary of State.
Sec. 81. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 82. 1. This section and section 81 of this act become
effective upon passage and approval.
2. Sections 1 to 80, inclusive, of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)